Hawaii statutes.
§168-5 Irrigation systems account.
(a) There shall be a special account in the irrigation system revolving fund
of the board of agriculture to be known as the "irrigation systems
account". The director of finance may make temporary use of any portion or
all of the money not immediately needed for construction and operation of an
irrigation system for the purpose of paying warrants drawn on the treasury for
current indebtedness of the State, or for deposit in the state sinking fund for
the repayment of bonds, or for investment in state bonds; provided that
sufficient of the sums so taken, deposited or invested shall be redeposited to
the credit of the irrigation systems account prior to the time when any
engagement for the payment from the account falls due.

The moneys from the account shall be expended
upon warrants drawn by the comptroller for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) In connection with the construction,
operation, or maintenance of a project, the board may use such contributions of
labor, materials, and property, including money, as may be allocated or
otherwise made available by any person or instrumentality whatsoever, if in the
judgment of the board the acceptance thereof, will not limit the scope of
construction or operation of a project provided for by this chapter.

(c) Money received and accepted under this
section shall be available for expenditure for the purposes for which
contributed in like manner as if the sums had been specifically appropriated
for such purposes.

(d) Any provision of this chapter or any other
state law to the contrary notwithstanding, it is expressly provided that, in
the event that it is found possible to secure federal funds made available
under any act of Congress to be expended in connection with or for the
construction of a project authorized by this chapter, the board may enter into
such undertakings with the proper officers or agencies of the federal
government, agree to such conditions, and do and perform such other acts and
things as may be necessary, or be required by such acts of Congress or any
regulations or requirements of the federal government, as a condition to
securing the federal funds for the project.

(e) Any other provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter may, with the approval of
the governor, be deposited with and pledged to, or be otherwise disposed of to,
the United States or any board, agency, or instrumentality of the United States
government, to secure the repayment, or in actual payment, of any loans or
advances made or to be made, under any act or acts of Congress authorizing the
loans or advances, by the United States or any such board, agency, or
instrumentality to the State for the construction, in whole or in part, of a
project authorized under this chapter or the cost of which, or any portion
thereof, would be payable or could legally be paid, out of the proceeds of the
bonds if sold.

(f) Any other provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the board may use moneys from the irrigation [systems] account
to contract for operation or maintenance of the project facilities if the board
deems such action to be in the public interests. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §2; am L
1998, c 289 §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next